District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.89

Appointment of special counsel.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, if the Attorney General determines that his or her duty to represent the public interest in a particular matter may prevent him or her from adequately representing the government, an agency, or an official, the Attorney General shall notify the Mayor of this circumstance and the Mayor shall appoint special counsel to represent the government, an agency, or an official for the matter.

(b)

If the Attorney General determines that he or she is unable to provide adequate representation pursuant to subsection (a) of this section in a matter in which the Mayor is expected to be adverse to the special counsel, the Attorney General shall notify the Chief Judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, who shall appoint the special counsel for the matter.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 109, 57 DCR 3012